Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.065

Delegation of powers and duties of commission in county with a population of one million or more.

Any county with a population of one million or more may assign the powers and duties of the commission to such county agencies or departments as may be designated by charter or ordinance: PROVIDED, That the powers and duties of the commission under RCW 41.14.120 shall not be assigned to any other body but shall continue to be vested in the commission, which shall exist to perform such powers and duties, together with such other adjudicative functions as may be designated by charter or ordinance.

[ 1991 c 363 s 115; 1987 c 251 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.